Illinois, session 104th, SB1255.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 1408.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/1408.1 new)7    Sec. 1408.1. Vehicles carried on a flatbed tow truck. A 8tow truck operator shall not allow a passenger to occupy the 9trailer, semitrailer, farm wagon, or any other vehicle being 10carried by a flatbed tow truck upon a public highway, unless:11        (1) the number of people that need to be transported 12    exceeds the seating capacity of the tow truck or a person 13    needing to be transported has a disability that limits 14    that person's ability to enter the tow truck;15        (2) there is a way for the passenger in the carried 16    vehicle to immediately communicate, either verbally, 17    audibly, or visually, with the tow truck operator in case 18    of an emergency; and19        (3) if the passenger is under 16 years of age, the 20    passenger is accompanied by an adult riding in the same 21    vehicle.22No passenger of a carried vehicle may exit the carried 23vehicle, ride outside of the passenger compartment of the   SB1255- 2 -LRB104 05682 LNS 15712 b1carried vehicle, or exhibit dangerous or distracting behaviors 2while the carried vehicle is upon a public highway.